Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2981.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin AVIVO; APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin $850,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $850,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of employment and economic development for a grant to Avivo to provide low-income individuals with career education and job skills training that is fully integrated with chemical and mental health services. This is a onetime appropriation. new text end